California, session 20252026, AB2368.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17031 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:17031. (a) In order to ensure that people have accurate and comprehensive information when accessing safety-net health care services in California, by July 1, 2027, the State Department of Health Care Services shall establish an internet website where the public can access information on safety-net health care services in the state.(b) The internet website established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include all of the following information and resources:(1) A person’s legally protected right to emergency medical care under state and federal law.(2) Payment support resources, including coverage options, state programs, hospital charity care, and other assistance that is available to help people access health care services.(3) Information about each county medically indigent health care program for uninsured individuals, program that provides health care to low-income county residents who are uninsured or underinsured, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) All eligibility requirements, including age, citizenship or immigration status requirements, residency requirements, and income income, and other resource limits.(B) The cost structure for applicants.(C) The telephone number to reach the appropriate county program administrator. obtain information about the program.(D) A hyperlink or Uniform Resource Locator (URL) for each county internet website related to safety-net services or medically indigent programs. health care safety-net programs.(E) Whether use of the program is subject to repayment and by what means the county may collect.(4) Any other information or resources that will assist an individual seeking comprehensive and accurate information about accessing medically indigent affordable health care services in the state.(c) The department shall consult with the California State Association of Counties, organizations advocating for consumers’ access to health care, and other entities with expertise in health care for medically indigent individuals, low-income Californians, as determined by the department.(d) The internet website shall have mobile capabilities.(e) The internet website shall comply with Section 508 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794d), regulations implementing that act as set forth in Part 1194 (commencing with Section 1194.1) of Chapter XI of Title 36 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and any laws or regulations governing the accessibility of state internet websites.(f) The department, in consultation with the entities described in subdivision (c), shall review the information and resources on the internet website to ensure that it is current and updated at reasonable intervals, but no less than once annually.(g) The internet website and informational materials created and distributed pursuant to this section shall be made available in a manner to ensure that they are accessible by all state residents. The internet website and informational materials shall comply with the Dymally-Alatorre Bilingual Services Act (Chapter 17.5 (commencing with Section 7290) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).(h) Each county shall submit any changes to the elements described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) to the department within 120 calendar days after either approval by the county’s board of supervisors or an administrative or regulatory change, whichever is applicable.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.